District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.15

Guidelines for consideration of applications.

(a)

Commemorative works on public space that are proposed for commemoration of local individuals, groups, events, or other significant elements of District of Columbia culture or history generally should be given priority over other commemorative works.

(b)

Subjects to be memorialized by commemorative works on public space in the District should be of long-term historic importance and shall generally not be any living person, any deceased person who has been deceased less than 10 years, nor any event that has occurred within 10 years of the application for placement of the commemorative work on public space.

(c)

In considering a proposed commemorative work on public space, the Mayor, the Council, and the Committee shall be guided by the following criteria, in addition to any other criteria set forth in this subchapter, and any other criteria not inconsistent with this subchapter developed by the Mayor and published in the D.C. Register:

D.C. Register

(1)

To the maximum extent possible, a commemorative work shall be located in surroundings that are relevant to and compatible with the subject of the commemorative work.

(2)

A commemorative work shall be situated in a manner that prevents interference with or encroachment upon any existing commemorative work, and that protects and enhances, to the maximum extent practicable, open space, existing public and private uses, and cultural and natural resources.

(3)

A commemorative work shall be constructed of durable material suitable to the outdoor environment, and any landscape features of a commemorative work shall be compatible with the climate.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 415
as added Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-275, § 2(d), 48 DCR 1660
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Commemorative Works on Public Space Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-564, January 31, 2001, 48 DCR 1627).
Delegation of Authority to Promulgate Rules Pursuant to the Commemorative Works on Public Space Amendment Act of 2000, see Mayor’s Order 2005-59, April 1, 2005 ( 52 DCR 5798).